New York, session 2025-2026, A4937.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 100-a of the economic development law, as added by 2 section 1 of part UUU of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is amended to 3 read as follows: 4 § 100-a. Comprehensive economic development reporting. The department 5 shall prepare an annual comprehensive economic development report, no 6 later than December thirty-first of each year, listing economic develop- 7 ment assistance provided by the New York state urban development corpo- 8 ration and the department, including but not limited to tax expendi- 9 tures, marketing and advertising, grants, awards and loans. Such 10 comprehensive report shall include aggregate totals for each economic 11 development program administered by the New York state urban development 12 corporation and the department, including but not limited to program 13 progress, program participation rates, economic impact, regional 14 distribution, industry trends, and any other information deemed neces- 15 sary by the commissioner. Such comprehensive report may also include a 16 summary of the extent to which community revitalization grant programs 17 incorporated the use of end-to-end fiber-optic architecture for the 18 provision of high-speed broadband internet service. The department shall 19 prominently post the comprehensive economic development report on its 20 website no later than January first of each year. 21 § 2. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 22 16-d of section 1 of chapter 174 of the laws of 1968, constituting the 23 New York state urban development corporation act, as added by chapter 24 169 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05654-01-5 A. 4937 2 1 (i) the potential impact the proposed project would have on economic 2 development and employment opportunities in the community and the 3 region, including the extent to which the proposed project will use 4 end-to-end fiber-optic architecture to deliver high-speed broadband 5 internet service in the project area; and 6 § 3. Paragraph (c) of subdivision 6 of section 16-n of section 1 of 7 chapter 174 of the laws of 1968, constituting the New York state urban 8 development corporation act, as added by section 2 of part C-2 of chap- 9 ter 109 of the laws of 2006, is amended to read as follows: 10 (c) Priority shall also be given to properties in economically 11 distressed communities which are defined as cities and other communities 12 determined by the commissioner of the department of economic development 13 on the basis of criteria indicative of economic distress, including 14 poverty rates, numbers of persons receiving public assistance, unemploy- 15 ment rates, rate of employment decline, population loss, rate of per 16 capita income change, decline in economic activity and private invest- 17 ment, and such other indicators as the commissioner deems appropriate to 18 be in need of economic assistance. For properties that contain residen- 19 tial apartment units or affordable housing units, priority shall also be 20 given to properties for which the municipality commits to using end-to- 21 end fiber-optic architecture to deliver high-speed broadband internet 22 service to such properties. 23 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.